activities/make/lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

!!! Part of speech
+N   ! Noun
+V   ! Verb

!!! Number
+Sg  ! Singular
+Pl  ! Plural

!!! Tense
+Past    ! Past tense
+Pres ! Present tense

!!! Verb tags
+3Sg ! 3rd person singular
+PresPtc ! Present participle


LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns
word Noun ;
apple Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:s # ;

LEXICON Verbs
walk V ;
talk V ;
pack V ;
t V-each-aught ; ! teach+V+Past:taught

LEXICON V-each-aught
each+V+Pres+3Sg:eaches # ;
each+V+Pres:each # ;
each+V+Past:aught # ;

LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

LEXICON V-suff
+Pres+3Sg:s   # ;
+Past:ed  # ;
+PresPtc:ing # ;
+Pres:    # ;
